es: Configuración de transporte del estuche para oboe: Correas de mochila; Combinación (múltiples modos de transporte); Transporte manual (asa); Correa de hombro; Con ruedas; Otro
ja: オーボエケースの持ち運び構成: バックパックストラップ; コンビネーション (複数の持ち運びモード); 手持ち (ハンドル); ショルダーストラップ; キャスター付き; その他
tr: Obua kılıfı taşıma konfigürasyonu: Sırt çantası askıları; Kombinasyon (çoklu taşıma modu); Elde taşıma (kulp); Omuz askısı; Tekerlekli; Diğer
cs: Konfigurace přenášení pouzdra hoboje: Popruhy na batoh; Kombinované (více způsobů nošení); Nošení v ruce (rukojeť); Ramenní popruh; Na kolečkách; Ostatní
pt-BR: Estojo para oboé configuração de transporte: Alças de mochila; Combinação (vários modos de transporte); Transporte manual (alça); Alça de ombro; Com rodinhas; Outro
nb: Bærekonfigurasjon for oboetui: Ryggsekkstropper; Kombinasjon (flere bæremåter); Håndbæring (håndtak); Skulderstropp; På hjul; Annet
da: Bærekonfiguration for oboetui: Rygsækstropper; Kombination (flere bæremuligheder); Håndholdt (håndtag); Skulderrem; Med hjul; Andet
pl: Konfiguracja noszenia futerału na obój: Paski plecaka; Kombinowany (wiele trybów przenoszenia); Do ręki (uchwyt); Pasek na ramię; Na kółkach; Inna
sk-SK: Konfigurácia prenosného puzdra na hoboj: Popruhy na batoh; Kombinácia (viacero spôsobov nosenia); Nosenie v ruke (rukoväť); Ramenný popruh; Na kolieskach; Iné
hr-HR: Konfiguracija nošenja kutije za obou: Naramenice za ruksak; Kombinirano (više načina nošenja); Ručno nošenje (ručka); Naramenica; S kotačićima; Ostalo
en: Oboe case carry configuration: Backpack straps; Combination (multiple carry modes); Hand carry (handle); Shoulder strap; Wheeled; Other
sl-SI: Konfiguracija prenašanja kovčka za oboo: Naramnice za nahrbtnik; Kombiniran (več načinov nošenja); Nošenje v roki (ročaj); Ramenski trak; Na kolesih; Drugo
el: Διαμόρφωση μεταφοράς θήκης όμποε: Ιμάντες πλάτης; Συνδυασμός (πολλαπλοί τρόποι μεταφοράς); Μεταφορά στο χέρι (λαβή); Λουρί ώμου; Με ρόδες; Άλλο
fr: Mode de port de l’étui de hautbois: Bretelles de sac à dos; Combinaison (plusieurs modes de transport); Transport à la main (poignée); Bandoulière; À roulettes; Autre
ro-RO: Modul de transport al cutiei pentru oboi: Bretele de rucsac; Combinație (moduri multiple de transport); Transport manual (mâner); Curea de umăr; Cu roți; Altele
hu: Oboatok hordozási elrendezése: Hátizsák pántok; Kombinált (többféle hordozási mód); Kézi hordozás (fogantyú); Vállpánt; Kerekes; Egyéb
nl: Hobo koffer draagconfiguratie: Rugzakbanden; Combinatie (meerdere draagwijzen); In de hand (handvat); Schouderband; Op wieltjes; Overig
pt-PT: Configuração de transporte interno da caixa oboé: Alças de mochila; Combinação (vários modos de transporte); Transporte à mão (pega); Alça de ombro; Com rodas; Outro
it: Configurazione di trasporto della custodia per oboe: Spallacci; Combinata (più modalità di trasporto); A mano (maniglia); Tracolla; Con rotelle; Altro
ru: Конфигурация переноски футляра для гобоя: Лямки рюкзака; Комбинированная (несколько способов переноски); Переноска в руках (ручка); Плечевой ремень; На колесиках; Другое
de: Tragekonfiguration des Oboenkoffers: Rucksackgurte; Kombination (mehrere Tragemodi); Handtragegriff; Schultergurt; Mit Rollen; Andere
fi: Oboekotelon kantotapa: Reppuolkaimet; Yhdistelmä (useita kantotapoja); Käsikanto (kahva); Olkahihna; Pyörällinen; Muu
sv: Bärkonfiguration för oboefodral: Ryggsäcksremmar; Kombination (flera bärsätt); Handburen (handtag); Axelrem; Med hjul; Övrigt
vi: Cấu hình mang hộp đựng kèn oboe: Quai đeo balo; Kết hợp (nhiều chế độ mang); Xách tay (tay cầm); Dây đeo vai; Có bánh xe; Khác
ko: 오보에 케이스 휴대 방식: 백팩 스트랩; 혼합형(다중 휴대 모드); 핸드 캐리(핸들); 숄더 스트랩; 바퀴형; 기타
zh-CN: 双簧管盒携带配置: 背包肩带; 组合型（多种携带方式）; 手提（提手）; 单肩背带; 带轮; 其他
th: การจัดวางกระเป๋าใส่โอโบ: สายสะพายหลัง; แบบผสม (รูปแบบการพกพาที่หลากหลาย); ถือด้วยมือ (หูหิ้ว); สายสะพายไหล่; มีล้อเลื่อน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Конфигурация за носене на калъф за обой: Презрамки за раница; Комбинирано (различни начини на носене); Носене в ръка (дръжка); Презрамка за рамо; С колелца; Друго
lt-LT: Obojaus dėklo nešiojimo konfigūracija: Kuprinės petnešos; Kombinuotas (keli nešiojimo būdai); Nešamas rankoje (rankena); Diržas per petį; Su ratukais; Kita
zh-TW: 雙簧管琴盒攜帶配置: 雙肩背帶; 組合式 (多種攜帶模式); 手提 (提把); 單肩背帶; 附輪; 其他